Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1579.01
Offices of commission; legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the Central Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact Commission shall establish a satellite office in the State of Nebraska within thirty days after May 26, 1989, and shall establish its central offices in the State of Nebraska prior to commencement of construction of the facility.

Laws 1988, LB 1092, § 7;

Laws 1989, LB 761, § 2.